Utah statutes.
4-19-1.   Department responsible for conduct and administration of rural rehabilitation program.

The department shall conduct and administer the rural rehabilitation program within the state in accordance with the agreement entered into in January 1975, between the United States of America through its Farm Home Administration and the state through its commissioner.

